District of Columbia statutes.
47-1030

Daughters of American Revolution — Square 173 — Lots 12, 13, 14, 15, and 16.

The property situated in square 173 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lots 12, 13, 14, 15, and 16, inclusive, occupied by the Daughters of the American Revolution, is exempt from and after February 28, 1921, from all taxation so long as the same is so occupied and used, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002, providing for exemptions of church and school property, and acts amendatory thereof.

History

Sept. 16, 1922, 42 Stat. 846, ch. 319
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1030.
1973 Ed., § 47-823.